Tennessee, session 114, HB2166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 32, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Autologous blood donation" means a blood donation of a person's
own blood for future use by that person;
(2) "Blood bank" means a facility for the collection, processing, storage,
or distribution of human blood, human blood components or derivatives, or the
performance of transfusion or reinfusion procedures;
(3) "Blood donation":
(A) Means the donation of whole blood or blood products; and
(B) Includes platelets, red blood cells, white blood cells, and
serum;
(4) "Directed blood donation" means a blood donation for which the
product of the donation is designated for use by a specific patient in advance of a
planned medical procedure; and
(5) "Physician" means a doctor of medicine licensed pursuant to title 63,
chapter 6, or a doctor of osteopathy licensed pursuant to title 63, chapter 9.
(b) A blood bank shall comply with a physician's order for an autologous blood
donation or directed blood donation for a specific patient. All such donations remain
subject to federal and state donor eligibility, testing, labeling, screening, storage, and
HB2166
011128
- 1 -

compatibility requirements. A blood bank may charge a reasonable and necessary fee
to cover the administrative cost of facilitating an autologous blood donation or directed
blood donation. This section does not authorize a waiver of any safety, testing, or
screening requirements under federal or state law.
(c) A hospital shall allow a patient scheduled for a medical procedure to provide
an autologous blood donation or directed blood donation when ordered by a physician.
A hospital may refuse such a donation only when medically contraindicated or
incompatible with safety standards. A hospital may charge a reasonable and necessary
fee to cover the administrative cost of facilitating such a donation. This section does not
authorize a waiver of federal or state blood-safety, testing, or compatibility requirements.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011128